Utah statutes.
58-28-605.   Veterinarian-client-patient confidentiality.

(1)  A licensee under this chapter may not disclose information about the licensee's care of an animal to anyone other than the client, as defined in Section 58-28-102, unless:

(a)  the client consents to the disclosure in writing;

(b)  disclosure to public health officials, animal health or welfare officials, agricultural authorities, or federal, state, or local officials is required, or necessary to protect the animal or to protect public health;

(c)  disclosure is required by court order or subpoena; or

(d)  the client has placed the veterinarian's care or treatment of the animal or the nature or extent of injuries to the animal at issue in a civil or criminal proceeding.

(2)  A licensee who releases medical records under the provisions of this section is not liable to the client or any other person for the release of the records.



Enacted by Chapter 109, 2006 General Session

